Maryland, session 2025, HB0928.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0928*

HOUSE BILL 928
Article – Estates and Trusts
4–102.
(a) Any person may make a will if the person is 18 years of age or older, and
legally competent to make a will.
(b) Except as provided in §§ 4–103 and 4–104 of this subtitle and [subsection (f)]
SUBSECTIONS (F) AND (G) of this section, every will shall be:
(1) In writing;
(2) Signed by the testator, or by some other person for the testator, in the
testator’s physical presence and by the testator’s express direction; and
(3) Attested and signed by two or more credible witnesses in:
(i) The physical presence of the testator; or
(ii) The electronic presence of the testator, provided that an
electronic will or remotely witnessed will satisfies the requirements under subsection (c) or
(d) of this section.
(G) (1) THE REQUIREMENTS UNDER THIS SUBSECTION APPLY TO THE
EXECUTION OF THE WILL OF A TESTATOR WHO IS MARRIED OR IN A REGISTERED
DOMESTIC PARTNERSHIP.
(2) AT THE TIME THAT THE TESTATOR AND WITNESSES SIGN THE
WILL UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(2) OF THIS SECTION, THE TESTATOR, OR THE PERSON
SIGNING ON BEHALF OF THE TESTATOR, MAY NOT BE IN THE PHYSICAL OR
ELECTRONIC PRESENCE OF THE TESTATOR’S SPOUSE OR REGISTERED DOMESTIC
PARTNER.
(3) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO WITNESSES AND SIGNS A TESTATOR’S WILL
IN SATISFACTION OF SUBSECTION (B)(3) OF THIS SECTION MAY NOT ALSO WITNESS
AND SIGN THE WILL OF THE TESTATOR’S SPOUSE OR REGISTERED DOMESTIC
PARTNER.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any wills executed before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.